Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.140

Service of warrant.

The sheriff, when he or she arrests a judgment debtor by virtue of a warrant issued as prescribed in this chapter, must deliver to him or her a copy of the warrant and of the affidavit upon which it was granted.

[ 2011 c 336 s 157; 1893 c 133 s 14; RRS s 626.]